Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2286.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 40-2,227 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 40-2,227. (a) No dental benefit plan shall contain restrictions on
methods of payment to a dentist from the dental benefit plan, such plan's
contracted vendor or health maintenance organization in which the only
acceptable payment method is a credit card payment.
(b) If initiating or changing payments to a dentist using electronic
funds transfer payments, including virtual credit card payments, a dental
benefit plan, such plan's contracted vendor or health maintenance
organization shall:
(1) Notify the dentist if any fees are associated with a particular
payment method; and
(2) advise the dentist of the available methods of payment and
provide clear instructions to the dentist as to how to select an alternative
payment method; and
(3) require that any decision by a dentist to select an alternative form
of payment shall remain in force through the duration of the contract and
any extension thereof.
(c) A dental benefit plan, such plan's contracted vendor or health
maintenance organization that initiates or changes payments to a dentist
through the automated clearing house network, as codified in 45 C.F.R. §§
162.1601 and 162.1602, as in effect on July 1, 2025, shall not charge a fee
solely to transmit the payment to a dentist unless the dentist has consented
to such fee. A dentist's agent may charge reasonable fees when
transmitting an automated clearing house network payment related to
transaction management, data management, portal services and other
value-added services in addition to the bank transmittal.
(d) The provisions of this section shall not be waived by contract.
Any contractual arrangement in conflict that conflicts with the provisions
of this section or that purports to waive any requirements of this section
shall be null and void and unenforceable.

HB 2286 2
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 40-2,227 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 3. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.